Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Department Employees Other Than State Troopers

16.186.
Definitions for KRS 16.186 to 16.195.

As used in KRS

16.186

to

16.195

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cabinet” means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the cabinet;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police;

“Officer” means any individual appointed to one (1) of the positions established by KRS

16.187

who has the powers of a peace officer;

“Department” means the Department of Kentucky State Police; and

“Continuous service” for participation in and eligibility for the promotional process for each rank of commercial vehicle enforcement officer means:

For sergeant, service as a commissioned officer that has not been interrupted by actual separation from the department, whether in the form of resignation, retirement, or termination;

For lieutenant, service in grade as a sergeant that has not been interrupted by actual separation from the department, whether in the form of resignation, retirement, termination, or by demotion in accordance with KRS

16.192

; and

For captain, service in grade as a lieutenant that has not been interrupted by actual separation from the department, whether in the form of resignation, retirement, termination, or by demotion in accordance with KRS

16.192

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2009). 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 75 sec. 1, provided that a new KRS Chapter 16A was to be established and a new section thereof was to be created for this statute. In codification, the Reviser of Statutes has instead created new sections of existing KRS Chapter 16 for 2009 Ky. Acts. ch. 75, secs. 1 to 10, under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(a).

16.187.
Positions of commercial vehicle enforcement officer, commercial vehicle enforcement officer R Class, arson investigator officer, hazardous devices investigative officer, facilities security officer, and legislative security specialist created within department.

The following positions shall be created within the Department of Kentucky State Police:

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers;

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers R Class;

Arson investigator officers;

Hazardous devices investigator officers;

Facilities security officers; and

Legislative security specialists.

These positions shall be appointed pursuant to KRS

16.188

and shall be utilized by the commissioner to enforce the laws of the Commonwealth and to comply with federal and state mandates.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 6, § 2, effective March 30, 2016.

16.188.
Appointment to positions created under KRS 16.187.

The following officers shall be appointed by the commissioner:

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers;

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers R Class;

Arson investigator officers;

Hazardous devices investigator officers; and

Legislative security specialists.

Facilities security officers shall be appointed by the secretary as special law enforcement officers under KRS

61.902

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 6, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 6, § 3, effective March 30, 2016.

16.189.
Powers and duties of officers in positions created under KRS 16.187.

The powers and duties of officers in the positions established by KRS

16.187

shall be as follows:

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers and commercial vehicle enforcement officers R class shall enforce:

Commercial vehicle licensure, operator, traffic, and criminal violations;

Motor vehicle operator, traffic, and criminal law violations on a highway; and

All the laws and administrative regulations of the Commonwealth at the direction of the commissioner;

Arson investigator officers shall enforce:

All criminal laws pertaining to arson; and

All the laws and administrative regulations of the Commonwealth at the direction of the commissioner;

Hazardous devices investigator officers shall enforce:

All criminal laws pertaining to hazardous devices; and

All the laws and administrative regulations of the Commonwealth at the direction of the commissioner;

Facilities security officers shall have the jurisdiction and duties established pursuant to KRS

61.900

to

61.930

; and

Legislative security specialists shall:

Provide protection and security for the personnel, property, and facilities of the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission and make arrests for unlawful activity; and

Enforce all the laws and all of the administrative regulations promulgated as required and in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A at the direction of the commissioner.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 64, § 7, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 6, § 4, effective March 30, 2016.

16.190.
False impersonation of officer or employee of state police. [Repealed.]

16.1901.
Minimum requirements for positions created under KRS 16.187.

At the time of appointment by the department or the secretary, officers shall meet the minimum requirements established by this subsection:

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers shall:

Meet at least one (1) of the following education or experience requirements:

Have completed at least fifty-four (54) semester hours with a college or university;

Possess at least two (2) years experience as a commercial vehicle inspector under the North American Standard Requirements;

Possess at least two (2) years experience as a full-time sworn law enforcement officer; or

Possess at least two (2) years experience in military duty;

Be of good moral character and capable of successfully meeting the physical fitness standards established by the commissioner; and

Meet the minimum qualifications for becoming a certified peace officer as provided by KRS

15.382

;

Arson investigator officers shall:

Possess at least one (1) year of law enforcement, police, criminal, fire, or arson investigation experience; and

Meet the minimum qualifications for becoming a certified peace officer as provided by KRS

15.382

;

Hazardous devices investigator officers shall:

Possess at least five (5) years of experience involving explosives or hazardous devices used in the areas of law enforcement, the military, or firefighting; and

Meet the minimum qualifications for becoming a certified peace officer as provided by KRS 15.382;

Facilities security officers shall be commissioned as special law enforcement officers under KRS

61.900

to

61.930

; and

Legislative security specialists shall:

Possess at least five (5) years of experience as a full-time sworn law enforcement officer; and

Meet the minimum qualifications for a certified peace officer as provided in KRS 15.382.

Upon completion of a probationary period of one (1) year:

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers, arson investigator officers, hazardous devices investigator officers, and legislative security specialists shall have successfully completed the Peace Officer Professional Standards (POPS) certification process through the Kentucky State Police Academy or through the Department of Criminal Justice Training; and

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers shall successfully complete and pass a certified course in General Hazardous Materials and North American Standard Driver/Vehicle Inspection.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2016 ch. 6, § 5, effective March 30, 2016.

16.191.
Promotions for positions created under KRS 16.187.

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers shall be promoted according to the terms and conditions established by this subsection:

Promotions to commercial vehicle enforcement sergeant within the department shall be on the following terms and conditions:

In order to be eligible for the promotion, the applicant shall have served as a commissioned commercial vehicle enforcement officer for at least six (6) years;

Promotions made by the department for this position shall be based upon the applicant’s cumulative score computed from twenty-five percent (25%) on personnel performance evaluation, thirty percent (30%) on job simulation examination, and forty-five percent (45%) on a written examination;

A promotional list shall be established and shall remain valid for one (1) year. The promotional list shall consist of the numerical scores and rankings of each applicant as provided by subparagraph 2. of this paragraph. Promotions shall be made in consecutive order beginning with the highest numerical ranking to fill an interim vacancy. If two (2) or more applicants receive the same numerical score, the order of placement on the list shall be determined by seniority of service. Upon the determination of a new numerical ranking following a new examination, all previous rankings shall be null and void;

The written examination for the applicant’s cumulative score shall be prepared and administered by an individual designated by the commissioner. Materials and textbooks for the examination shall be selected by the commissioner and his or her staff. At least three (3) months prior to the examination date, the commissioner shall inform all applicants of the exact material and textbooks from which test questions will be taken and the minimum score required to be eligible for placement on the promotional list. The written examination shall be administered to all applicants at the same time and the applicant shall receive his or her numerical score immediately upon completion of the written examination. An applicant’s numerical score shall remain valid for a period of two (2) years following the date of the examination unless the source material used as the basis for the test changes by more than thirty percent (30%), provided the numerical score meets or exceeds the minimum score set in subsection (2)(d) of this section;

The job simulation examination shall be evaluated by boards designated by the commissioner that shall consist of:

The commissioner or his or her designee. The designee shall have a rank no lower than commercial vehicle enforcement captain;

An officer from another police agency of the rank equal to the position for which the applicant is competing;

An instructor from an accredited law enforcement education program;

A personnel director from private industry; and

A commercial vehicle enforcement officer of the rank equal to the position for which the applicant is competing;

The designated job simulation examination boards shall perform all evaluations under guidelines developed and approved by the commissioner; and

Personnel performance evaluations shall be made by the appropriate supervisory personnel under procedures established and approved by the commissioner;

Promotions from commercial vehicle enforcement sergeant to commercial vehicle enforcement lieutenant within the department shall be on the same terms and conditions as promotions to sergeant. In addition, any applicant for lieutenant shall have completed at least one (1) year of continuous service in grade as a sergeant;

Promotions from commercial vehicle enforcement lieutenant to commercial vehicle enforcement captain within the department shall be on the same terms and conditions as promotions to lieutenant. In addition, any applicant for captain shall have completed at least one (1) year of continuous service in grade as a lieutenant;

The department shall develop and administer only one (1) test for each of the ranks established by this subsection. All eligible applicants shall be permitted to participate in the promotional process to the next highest position of responsibility wherever a vacancy exists;

Officers promoted to rank of sergeant, lieutenant, or captain shall serve a probationary period for one (1) year of continuous service from the effective date of their promotions, and may be reverted to their previous rank with or without cause at any time during this period;

Promotions to the rank of commercial vehicle enforcement major are temporary and shall not be subject to the provisions for selection and promotion as required by this subsection. All officers in such temporary positions shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and shall revert to their previous permanent rank upon the termination of their temporary appointment;

The total number of supervisory officers of all classifications established by this subsection shall be limited to a ratio not to exceed one (1) supervisor for every five (5) nonsupervisory officers; and

No officer of the department, other than temporary positions above the rank of captain, shall be promoted to the next highest rank without competing with other officers as prescribed by the promotional procedure established by this subsection.

Promotions from hazardous devices investigator officer to hazardous devices supervisor shall be on the following terms and conditions:

The applicant shall have at least seven (7) years of experience involving explosives or hazardous devices used in the areas of law enforcement, the military, or firefighting;

The applicant shall hold a current certification as a hazardous devices technician issued by a national hazardous devices school;

When there is a single applicant for a position, the applicant shall:

For a written examination, complete and achieve at least a minimum score as determined by the commissioner in consultation with the Kentucky State Police Promotional Review Board;

For a job simulation exercise, complete and achieve at least a minimum score as determined by the commissioner in consultation with the Kentucky State Police Promotional Review Board;

For a personnel performance evaluation, achieve a minimum score as determined by the commissioner in consultation with the Kentucky State Police Promotional Review Board; and

Submit to an oral interview before a board of supervisory personnel designated by the commissioner;

When there are multiple applicants for a position, promotions shall be based upon a cumulative score computed from twenty-five percent (25%) on personnel performance evaluation, thirty percent (30%) on job simulation examination, and forty-five percent (45%) on a written examination on which the applicant achieved at least a minimum score as determined by the commissioner in consultation with the Kentucky State Police Promotional Review Board. If an applicant is not employed by the department, job evaluations from past employers shall substitute for the personnel performance evaluation on a scale established by department’s human resources branch;

Personnel performance evaluations shall be made by the appropriate supervisory personnel under procedures established and approved by the commissioner; and

The commissioner may appoint a hazardous devices supervisor from outside of the department if the applicant meets the minimum requirements for promotion from hazardous devices investigator to hazardous devices supervisor as provided by this subsection.

Facilities security officers shall be promoted according to the terms and conditions established by this subsection:

Promotions to facilities security sergeant within the department shall be on the following terms and conditions:

The applicant shall have served as either a facilities security officer for at least two (2) years or possess at least two (2) years of other law enforcement or security services experience;

The applicant shall complete and pass a written examination established by the department;

When there are multiple applicants for a position, promotions shall be based upon a cumulative score computed from sixty percent (60%) on personnel performance evaluation and forty percent (40%) on a written examination. If an applicant is not employed by the department, job evaluations from past employers shall substitute for the personnel performance evaluation on a scale established by the department’s human resources branch; and

Personnel performance evaluations shall be made by the appropriate supervisory personnel under procedures established and approved by the commissioner; and

Promotions or appointments to facilities security lieutenant within the department shall be on the following terms and conditions:

The applicant shall have served as either a facilities security officer for at least three (3) years or possess at least three (3) years of other law enforcement or security services experience;

The applicant shall have at least two (2) years previous supervisory experience in a law enforcement or security services position;

The applicant shall complete and pass a written examination established by the department;

When there are multiple applicants for a position, promotions shall be based upon a cumulative score computed from sixty percent (60%) on personnel performance evaluation and forty percent (40%) on a written examination. If an applicant is not employed by the department, job evaluations from past employers shall substitute for the personnel performance evaluation on a scale established by the department’s human resources branch; and

Personnel performance evaluations shall be made by the appropriate supervisory personnel under procedures established and approved by the commissioner.

There shall be no discrimination based on race, sex, age, national origin, color, religion, creed, or political affiliation with respect to the department promotional system. All personnel actions are to be based solely on merit.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2016 ch. 6, § 6, effective March 30, 2016.

16.192.
Removal, suspension, or reduction of grade or pay for positions created under KRS 16.187.

With the exceptions specified in this section and KRS

16.193

, no officer commissioned under KRS

16.186

to

16.195

shall be removed, suspended, or reduced in grade or pay for any reason except inefficiency, misconduct, insubordination, or violation of law or of any administrative regulation promulgated by the commissioner. Any person may present charges in writing against any officer, which shall be filed with the Office of Internal Affairs, which shall be designated by the commissioner as the recipient of charges and shall be administratively responsible for the maintenance of good order within the department through the collection and investigation of charges and the retention of their dispositions. The charges shall be signed by the person filing the charges, and shall set out with clarity and distinction each and every charge. The commissioner, whenever probable cause appears, shall present charges against any officer whom he believes to have been guilty of conduct justifying his removal or punishment, in the interest of public order. Within five (5) days after the filing of charges, the Office of Internal Affairs shall deliver a copy thereof, personally, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the officer offending. Within five (5) days after the receipt thereof, the officer may demand a public hearing, or may admit the truth of the charges in whole or in part. If the officer admits the truthfulness of the charges, the commissioner shall remove, suspend, or reduce in rank or pay the officer so offending, in proportion to the seriousness of the charges.

If the charges are denied and the officer demands a hearing within the time specified by subsection (1) of this section, he shall make his demand known to the commissioner in writing. After a demand for hearing has been made by the officer, the commissioner, within twenty (20) days from the date thereof shall arrange for a public hearing before a trial board to be constituted in the manner provided in this section. The officer defendant shall be given not less than twenty (20) days notice of the time, place, and hour of the hearing.

Upon the hearing, all charges shall be considered traversed and put in issue, and the trial shall be confined and limited to the issues presented by the written charges. The trial board hearing the charges may summon and compel the attendance of witnesses at all hearings or sittings, by subpoena issued by the commissioner and served upon any witness by any sheriff or other person authorized by law to serve process. If any person fails to comply with any lawful order of the department or with process, or if any witness refuses to testify concerning any matter in which he may lawfully be interrogated, any Circuit Judge, upon application of the trial board or the commissioner, may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued from the Circuit Court or a refusal to testify in that court.

The officer defendant shall have the right to subpoena in his behalf any witnesses he may desire upon furnishing their names to the trial board or to the commissioner. The officer shall likewise have the right to appear in person and by counsel.

All charges against the officer defendant, together with all proceedings before the trial board, shall be transcribed and reduced to writing and a permanent record kept thereof.

In any instance where the commissioner has probable cause to believe that an officer has been guilty of conduct justifying his removal or punishment, he may immediately suspend the officer from duty, or from both pay and duty, pending trial, and the officer shall not be again placed on duty or allowed pay thereafter until a determination of the charges under this section.

The trial board, after hearing the charges, shall fix the punishment of any officer found guilty of any one (1) or more charges, by reprimand or suspension for any length of time not to exceed six (6) months, or by reducing the grade if the officer’s classification warrants same, or by combining any two (2) or more of the punishments, or by reducing the monthly salary of the officer by not more than twenty percent (20%) for not more than six (6) months, or by removing or dismissing from the service of the department any officer so found guilty.

For the purpose of hearing charges against any officer, as set forth in this section, there is created a trial board, which shall consist of the commissioner and a panel of ten (10) officers of the department appointed by the commissioner which shall be composed of six (6) commercial vehicle enforcement officers, two (2) facilities security officers, one (1) arson investigator officer, and one (1) hazardous devices investigator officer. The commissioner shall designate from the panel seven (7) members consisting of four (4) commercial vehicle enforcement officers, one (1) facilities security officer, one (1) arson investigator officer, and one (1) hazardous devices investigator officer, to hear charges against any officer in the manner and under the procedures established by this section. The commissioner may promulgate reasonable administrative regulations governing the procedure before the trial board that do not conflict with this section. The panel or trial board shall be a continuing body and the officers designated shall serve on the board or panel in addition to their other duties without any increase in compensation, except they may be reimbursed for meals, lodging, and traveling expenses incurred while in the performance of their official duties as members of the board or panel. Any officer defendant may for cause challenge the right of any member of the board in the trial of any action against him, and if the remaining members of the board find that the challenge is justifiable, the member of the board shall be excused from hearing the charges, and another member substituted from the panel.

No officer is entitled to a hearing as provided in this section unless his suspension is for more than twenty (20) days, or his pay reduced more than ten percent (10%), except that if the officer receives more than twenty (20) days suspension or reduction in salary of more than ten percent (10%) within a period of one (1) year, he shall have the right to a hearing as provided by this section.

Any officer appointed to the department under this section shall be considered on probation for a period of one (1) year from and after the date of his appointment, and during that period may be discharged or suspended or reduced in rank or pay, with or without cause, by the commissioner. The rights conferred upon an officer for a hearing, as provided in this section, shall not accrue until the officer has been employed by the department for a period of one (1) year or more.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 7, effective June 25, 2009.

16.193.
Appeal of judgment of trial board to Franklin Circuit Court — Appeal of court’s judgment to Court of Appeals.

Any officer of the department found guilty by the trial board of any charge as provided in KRS

16.192

shall have the right, within ten (10) days from the date of judgment of the trial board, to appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court if the punishment is:

A suspension of more than twenty (20) days;

A pay reduction of more than ten percent (10%);

A grade reduction if his classification so warrants; or

Dismissal from the department.

The enforcement of the judgment of the trial board upon said charges shall not be suspended during the appeal.

To perfect the appeal within the specified time, an officer shall file a copy of the order, all the evidence heard, and a full transcribed record relative to the charges with the Franklin County Circuit Clerk. The officer shall first post a bond to secure the cost of the action in a lump-sum amount to be approved by the circuit clerk, with corporate surety approved by the Department of Insurance as to solvency and responsibility and authority to transact business in this state, or the officer may post a cash bond. The members of the trial board and the commissioner shall be necessary parties to the appeal. The circuit clerk shall docket the case as though it were a petition in equity and shall immediately issue a summons for the appellee. The summons shall be returnable in the same manner as in equity cases. Service of summons upon the commissioner or acting commissioner shall be deemed service upon the board.

The appeal shall be scheduled for trial as soon as possible, and the hearing thereof shall be expedited in the same manner as a declaratory judgment suit.

No new or additional evidence shall be introduced in the Franklin Circuit Court, except as to fraud or misconduct of some party involved in the investigation of the charges or a member of the trial board. The court shall sit in appellate jurisdiction and shall not overturn the verdict of the trial board unless it finds:

The board acted without or in excess of its powers;

The order appealed from was procured by fraud; or

If questions of fact are at issue, whether any substantial evidence exists to support the order issued by the trial board. The court shall enter a judgment sustaining or setting aside the order of the trial board. The cost of the action shall follow the judgment of the court.

Any party aggrieved by a judgment of the Franklin Circuit Court may appeal to the Court of Appeals in the manner provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure. The appeal shall be docketed within sixty (60) days from the entry of judgment, unless the time is extended by the Franklin Circuit Court, but in no event beyond one hundred twenty (120) days from the entry of judgment.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 8, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 24, effective July 15, 2010.

16.194.
Retirement system participation for positions governed by KRS 16.186 to 16.195.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, officers governed by KRS

16.186

to

16.195

shall participate in the following retirement systems:

Commercial vehicle enforcement officers, arson investigator officers, hazardous devices investigator officers, and legislative security specialists shall participate in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System under hazardous duty coverage; and

Facilities security officers shall participate in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System under nonhazardous coverage.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 9, effective June 25, 2009; 2016 ch. 6, § 7, effective March 30, 2016.

16.195.
Administration of specified subjects to be same as for state police officers.

For officers governed by KRS

16.186

to

16.195

, the following subjects shall be administered in the same manner as provided for state police officers governed by KRS

16.010

to

16.185

:

Prohibition against requesting or requiring victim of alleged sexual offense to submit to polygraph or other examination, as provided by KRS

16.062

;

Organization of the department, as provided by KRS 16.040(1);

Additional duties of the department, as provided by KRS

16.065

;

Uniforms, equipment, and facilities, as provided by KRS

16.070

;

Automobile liability insurance, as provided by KRS

16.075

;

Bonds of employees, as provided by KRS

16.080

;

Training school, as provided by KRS

16.090

;

Officers required to take educational course on AIDS, as provided by KRS

16.095

;

Travel expenses and per diem allowances, as provided by KRS

16.100

;

Fees or rewards, as provided by KRS

16.110

;

Disabled officer on hazardous duty may elect to be retained on payroll, as provided by KRS

16.165

.

Election of benefits by disabled officer, as provided by KRS

16.167

.

Political activity forbidden, as provided by KRS

16.170

; and

Indemnification of state police officer sued for act or omission in line of duty who suffers financial loss, as provided by KRS

16.185

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 75, § 10, effective June 25, 2009.